District of Columbia statutes.
21-2061

Death, resignation, or removal of conservator.

The court may remove a conservator for good cause, upon notice and hearing, or accept the resignation of a conservator. Upon the conservator’s death, resignation, or removal, the court may appoint another conservator. A conservator so appointed succeeds to the title and powers of the predecessor.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2061.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-314 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).